Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 22.2 Alcohol Boating Safety Act

46-22.2-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as “The Alcohol Boating Safety Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 231, § 1.

46-22.2-2.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:

“Chemical test” means an analysis of a person’s blood, breath, urine, or other bodily substance for the determination of the presence of alcohol or a controlled substance.

“Controlled substance” means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor in schedules I-V of chapter 28 of title 21. The term shall not include distilled spirits, wine, or malt beverages, as those terms are defined or used in chapter 1 of title 3, nor tobacco.

“Intoxicated” means under the influence of alcohol, a controlled substance, any drug other than alcohol or a controlled substance, or any combination of alcohol, controlled substance, or drugs, so that there is impaired thought and action and loss of normal control of a person’s faculties to such an extent as to endanger any person.

“Law enfordement officer” means an employee, the duties of whose position include investigation, apprehension, or detention of individuals suspected or convicted of offenses against the criminal laws of the state and includes environmental police officers employed by the department of environmental management.

“Prima facie evidence of intoxication” includes evidence that at the time of an alleged violation there was eight hundredths of one percent (.08%), or more, by weight of alcohol in the person’s blood if twenty-one (21) years of age or older or two hundredths of one percent (.02%) or more by weight of alcohol in the person’s blood if under the age of twenty-one (21).

“Relevant evidence” includes evidence that at the time of the alleged violation there was at least five hundredths of one percent (.05%) but less than eight hundredths of one percent (.08%) by weight of alcohol in the person’s blood if twenty-one (21) years of age or older or two hundredths of one percent (.02%) or more by weight of alcohol in the person’s blood if under the age of twenty-one (21).

“Watercraft” means a device for transportation by water.

“Serious bodily injury” means physical injury that creates a substantial risk of death or causes serious permanent disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ.

“Blood alcohol level” means the percent by weight of alcohol in a person’s blood, based upon milligrams of alcohol per one hundred (100) cubic centimeters of blood.

“Operator” means the person who is steering a watercraft as it is underway.

“Underway” means that a watercraft is not at anchor or made fast to shore or ground.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 131, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 161, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 103, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 250, § 1.

46-22.2-3.
Violations by intoxicated watercraft operators.

Any person who operates or otherwise drives any watercraft in waters over which this state has jurisdiction while intoxicated or after he or she has been ordered not to operate a watercraft under the provisions of this chapter, shall be guilty of a civil violation, a misdemeanor or a felony and punished as set forth in this section.

Any person who operates any watercraft in waters over which this state has jurisdiction while intoxicated and while so operating causes the death or serious bodily injury to another person shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished in accordance with subdivision (f)(2) of this section.

Any person charged under subsection (a) whose blood alcohol level is eight one-hundredths of one percent (.08%) or more by weight as shown by a chemical test of a blood, breath, or urine sample shall be guilty of violating subsection (a) of this section. This provision shall not preclude a conviction based on other admissible evidence. Proof of guilt under this section may also be based on evidence that the person charged was under the influence of intoxicating liquor, drugs, toluene, or any controlled substance or any combination thereof, to a degree which rendered such person incapable of safely operating a watercraft. The fact that any person charged with violating this section is or has been legally entitled to use alcohol or a drug shall not constitute a defense against any charge of violating this section.

Any person who operates or otherwise drives any watercraft in waters over which this state has jurisdiction with a blood presence of any controlled substance, as shown by a chemical test of a blood or urine sample, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in subdivisions (d)(2) and (e)(1) of this section, or, for a third or subsequent violation of this subsection, shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished as provided in subdivision (f)(1) of this section.

Every person convicted of a first violation of subdivision (c)(1) of this section whose blood alcohol level is eight one-hundredths of one percent (.08%) but less than one-tenth of one percent (.1%) by weight shall be found to have committed a civil violation and may be subject to a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250), may be required to perform ten (10) to sixty (60) hours of public community restitution, may be required to attend a department of environmental management endorsed boating safety course, and his or her right to operate a watercraft shall be suspended for up to forty-five (45) days.

Every person convicted of a first violation of subdivision (c)(1) of this section whose blood alcohol level is one-tenth of one percent (.1%) but less than fifteen hundredths of one percent (.15%) by weight, or whose blood alcohol level is unknown, or who has been convicted of a first violation of subdivision (c)(2) of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to a mandatory fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than three hundred dollars ($300) and shall be required to perform ten (10) to sixty (60) hours of public community restitution and/or shall be imprisoned for up to one year. The sentence may be served in any unit of the adult correctional institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge. The person’s right to operate a watercraft shall be suspended for a period of three (3) months to six (6) months. The sentencing judge shall require attendance at a department of environmental management endorsed boating safety course, and/or alcoholic or drug treatment for the individual.

Every person convicted of a first violation of subdivision (c)(1) of this section whose blood alcohol level is fifteen hundredths of one percent (.15%) or more by weight, or who is under the influence of a drug, toluene or any controlled substance, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to a mandatory fine of five hundred dollars ($500) and shall be required to perform twenty (20) to sixty (60) hours of public community restitution and/or shall be imprisoned for up to one year. The sentence may be served in any unit of the adult correctional institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge. The person’s right to operate a watercraft shall be suspended for a period of three (3) months to six (6) months. The sentencing judge shall require attendance at a department of environmental management endorsed boating safety course, and/or alcohol or drug treatment for the individual.

Every person convicted of a second violation of subdivision (c)(1) of this section within a five (5) year period whose blood alcohol level is eight one-hundredths of one percent (.08%) but less than fifteen hundredths of one percent (.15%) by weight, or whose blood alcohol level is unknown, or who is convicted of a second violation of subdivision (c)(2) of this section regardless of whether the prior violation and subsequent conviction was a violation and subsequent conviction under this statute or under the boating under the influence of liquor or drugs statute of any other state, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to a mandatory fine of four hundred dollars ($400). The person’s right to operate a watercraft shall be suspended for a period of one year to two (2) years, and the individual shall be sentenced to not less than ten (10) days nor more than one year in jail. The sentence may be served in any unit of the adult correctional institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge; however, not less than forty-eight (48) hours of imprisonment shall be served consecutively. The sentencing judge may require alcohol or drug treatment for the individual.

Every person convicted of a second violation of subdivision (c)(1) of this section within a five (5) year period whose blood alcohol level is fifteen hundredths of one percent (.15%) or more by weight, or who is under the influence of a drug, toluene, or any controlled substance, regardless of whether the prior violation and subsequent conviction was a violation and subsequent conviction under this statute or under the boating under the influence of liquor or drugs statute of any other state, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to mandatory imprisonment of not less than six (6) months nor more than one year, a mandatory fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), and a mandatory suspension of that person’s right to operate a watercraft for a period of two (2) years from the date of completion of the sentence imposed under this subsection. The sentence may be served in any unit of the adult correctional institution in the discretion of the sentencing judge; however, not less than forty-eight (48) hours of imprisonment shall be served consecutively. The sentencing judge may require alcohol or drug treatment for the individual.

Every person convicted of a third or subsequent violation of subdivision (c)(1) of this section within a five (5) year period whose blood alcohol level is eight one hundredths of one percent (.08%) but less than fifteen hundredths of one percent (.15%) by weight, or whose blood alcohol level is unknown, or who is convicted of a third or subsequent violation of subdivision (c)(2) of this section, regardless of whether any prior violation and subsequent conviction was a violation and subsequent conviction under this statute or under the boating under the influence of liquor or drugs statute of any other state shall be guilty of a felony and be subject to a mandatory fine of four hundred dollars ($400). The person’s right to operate a watercraft shall be suspended for a period of two (2) years to three (3) years, and the individual shall be sentenced to not less than one year and not more than three (3) years in jail. The sentence may be served in any unit of the adult correctional institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge; however, not less than forty-eight (48) hours of imprisonment shall be served consecutively. The sentencing judge shall require alcohol or drug treatment for the individual.

Every person convicted of a third or subsequent violation of subdivision (c)(1) of this section within a five (5) year period whose blood alcohol level is fifteen hundredths of one percent (.15%) or more by weight or who is under the influence of a drug, toluene, or any controlled substance, regardless of whether any prior violation and subsequent conviction was a violation and subsequent conviction under this statute or under the boating under the influence of liquor or drugs statute of any other state, or who is convicted of a violation of subsection (b) of this section, shall be guilty of a felony and shall be subject to mandatory imprisonment of not less than three (3) years nor more than five (5) years, a mandatory fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and a mandatory suspension of that person’s right to operate a watercraft for a period of three (3) years from the date of completion of the sentence imposed under this subsection. The sentence may be served in any unit of the adult correctional institution in the discretion of the sentencing judge; however, not less than forty-eight (48) hours of imprisonment shall be served consecutively. The sentencing judge shall require alcohol or drug treatment for the individual.

In addition to the foregoing penalties, every person convicted of a third or subsequent violation of subdivision (c)(1) of this section within a five (5) year period regardless of whether any prior violation and subsequent conviction was a violation and subsequent conviction under this statute or under the boating under the influence of liquor or drugs statute of any other state shall be subject, in the discretion of the sentencing judge, to having the watercraft owned and operated by a violator seized and sold by the state of Rhode Island, with all funds obtained thereby to be transferred to the general fund.

Any person over the age of eighteen (18) who is convicted under this section for operating or otherwise driving any watercraft in waters over which the state has jurisdiction while under the influence of alcohol, a drug, toluene or any controlled substance, while a child under the age of thirteen (13) was present as a passenger in the watercraft when the offense was committed, may be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not more than one year and further shall not be entitled to the benefit of suspension or deferment of this sentence. The sentence imposed under this subsection may be served in any unit of the adult correctional institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge.

In addition to any other fines, any person convicted of a violation under this section shall pay a boating safety assessment fine of five hundred dollars ($500), which shall be deposited into the general fund. The assessment fine provided for by this subsection shall be collected from a violator before any other fines authorized by this section.

Any person who operates or otherwise drives any watercraft in waters over which this state has jurisdiction after he or she has been ordered not to operate a watercraft under the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to a fine of at least four hundred dollars ($400), shall be required to perform thirty (30) to sixty (60) hours of public community restitution, and/or shall be imprisoned for up to one year. The person’s right to operate a watercraft shall be suspended for an additional period of one to two (2) years.

If the person convicted of violating this section is under the age of eighteen (18) years, for the first violation he or she shall be required to perform ten (10) to sixty (60) hours of public community restitution, and the juvenile’s right to operate a watercraft shall be suspended for a period of forty-five (45) days, and may be suspended for a period of up to six (6) months. The sentencing judge shall also require attendance at a department of environmental management endorsed boating safety course, and substance and alcohol or drug education and/or treatment for the juvenile.

If the person convicted of violating this section is under the age of eighteen (18) years, for a second or subsequent violation, regardless of whether any prior violation and subsequent conviction was a violation and subsequent under this statute or under the boating under the influence of liquor or drugs statute of any other state, he or she shall be subject to a mandatory suspension of his or her right to operate a watercraft until such time as he or she is twenty-one (21) years of age and may, in the discretion of the sentencing judge, also be sentenced to the Rhode Island training school for a period of not more than one year and/or a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

Jurisdiction for violations of this section shall be with the district court for persons eighteen (18) years of age or older and to the family court for persons under the age of eighteen (18) years. The courts shall have full authority to impose any sentence authorized and to order the suspension of the right to operate watercraft for violations of this section. All trials in the district court and family court of violations of the section shall be scheduled within thirty (30) days of the arraignment date. No continuance or postponement shall be granted except for good cause shown. Any continuances that are necessary shall be granted for the shortest practicable time. Trials in superior court are not required to be scheduled within thirty (30) days of the arraignment date.

No fines, suspensions, assessments, alcohol or drug treatment programs, boating safety course, public community restitution or jail provided for under this section can be suspended.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 257, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 131, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 161, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 103, § 1.

46-22.2-3.1.
Additional penalties for underage offenders.

If not otherwise subject to a penalty for violations of this chapter contained in §

46-22.2-3

, any watercraft operator under the age of twenty-one (21) years of age who violates any provision of this chapter may be assessed the following additional penalties:

Suspension of motor vehicle operator’s license for one year;

Suspension of the right to operate a watercraft for an additional period of three (3) months to six (6) months;

Suspension of owner’s/operator’s registration of the watercraft that was being operated at the time of this chapter’s violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 250, § 2.

46-22.2-4.
Repealed.

46-22.2-5.
Chemical tests for intoxication.

Any person who operates a watercraft in waters over which this state has jurisdiction impliedly consents to submit to the chemical test provisions of this chapter as a condition of operating a watercraft in this state.

A law enforcement officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed an offense under this chapter shall offer the person the opportunity to submit to a chemical test. It is not necessary for the law enforcement officer to offer a chemical test to an unconscious person. A law enforcement officer may offer a person more than one chemical test under this chapter. However, all tests must be administered within three (3) hours after the officer had probable cause to believe the person violated this chapter. A person must submit to each chemical test offered by a law enforcement officer in order to comply with the implied consent provisions of this chapter.

If the chemical test results in relevant evidence, as defined in §

46-22.2-2(6)

that the person is intoxicated, he or she may be arrested for an offense under this chapter. If the chemical test results in prima facie evidence as defined in §

46-22.2-2(5)

that the person is intoxicated, he or she shall be arrested for an offense under this chapter.

Any person who refuses to submit to a chemical test may be arrested for an offense under this chapter.

At any proceeding under this chapter, a person’s refusal to submit to a chemical test is inadmissible into evidence as to intoxication, but may be used as evidence of refusal.

The provisions of §

31-27-2

concerning the certification and use of chemical breath tests apply to the use of such tests in a prosecution under this chapter.

For the purposes of this section, any test of a sample of blood, breath or urine for the presence of alcohol, which relies in whole or in part upon the principal of infrared light absorption, is considered a chemical test.

If a person for religious or medical reasons cannot be subjected to blood tests, and the person has filed an affidavit with the division of motor vehicles stating the reasons why he or she cannot be required to take blood tests, and a notation to that effect has been made on his or her license, and the license is presented to the law enforcement officer, the person, if asked to submit to chemical tests as provided under this chapter, shall only be required to submit to chemical tests of his or her urine. When a person is requested to submit to blood tests, only a physician or registered nurse or a medical technician certified under regulations promulgated by the director of the department of health may withdraw blood for the purpose of determining the alcoholic content in it. This limitation shall not apply to the taking of breath or urine specimens. The person tested shall be permitted to have a physician of his or her choosing and at his or her own expense administer chemical tests of his or her breath, blood and/or urine in addition to the tests administered at the discretion of a law enforcement officer.

If a person having been placed under arrest pursuant to this chapter refuses upon the request of a law enforcement officer to submit to a chemical test under this chapter, none shall be given, but a sentencing judge, upon receipt of a report of a law enforcement officer: that he or she had reasonable grounds to believe the arrested person had been operating or otherwise driving a watercraft in waters over which this state has jurisdiction while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, toluene, or any controlled substance, or any combination of these; that the person had been informed of his or her rights; that the person had been informed of the penalties incurred as a result of noncompliance with this section; and that the person had refused to submit to the test upon the request of a law enforcement officer; shall order as follows:

Impose for the first violation a fine of not less than three hundred dollars ($300) and order the person to perform ten (10) to sixty (60) hours of public community restitution. In addition, the person’s right to operate a watercraft shall be suspended for a period of one year. In addition, the sentencing judge may require the person to attend a department of environmental management endorsed boating safety course, and/or receive alcohol or drug treatment.

Every person convicted of a second violation within a five (5) year period shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, shall be imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, and shall pay a fine of not less than six hundred dollars ($600). In addition, the person’s right to operate a watercraft shall be suspended for a period of two (2) years. In addition, the sentencing judge may require the person to receive alcohol or drug treatment.

Every person convicted of a third or subsequent violation within a five (5) year period shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, shall be imprisoned for not more than one year, and shall pay a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000). In addition, the person’s right to operate a watercraft shall be suspended for a period of three (3) years. In addition, the sentencing judge may require the person to receive alcohol or drug treatment.

Jurisdiction for violations of this section shall be with the district court for persons eighteen (18) years of age or older and to the family court for persons under the age of eighteen (18) years. The court shall have full authority to impose any sentence authorized and to order the suspension of the right to operate watercraft for violations of this section. All trials in the district court and family court of violations of the section shall be scheduled within thirty (30) days of the arraignment date. No continuance or postponement shall be granted except for good cause shown. Any continuances that are necessary shall be granted for the shortest practicable time. Trials in superior court are not required to be scheduled within thirty (30) days of the arraignment date.

In addition to any other fines, any person convicted of a violation under this section shall pay a boating safety assessment fine of five hundred dollars ($500), which shall be deposited into the general fund. The assessment fine provided for by this subsection shall be collected from a violator before any other fines authorized by this section.

In addition to any other fines and boating safety assessment fine, a two hundred dollars ($200) assessment shall be paid by any person found in violation of this section to support the department of health’s chemical testing programs outlined in subsection 31-27-2(4), which shall be deposited as general revenues, not restricted receipts.

No fines, suspensions, assessments, alcohol or drug treatment programs, boating safety course, public community restitution, or jail provided for under this section can be suspended.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 257, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 131, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 161, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 103, § 1.

46-22.2-6.
Admissibility of evidence.

At any proceeding concerning an offense under this chapter, evidence of the amount of intoxicating liquor, toluene, or any controlled substance, or any combination of these in the blood of the person charged with the offense at the time of the alleged violation, as shown by a chemical analysis of his or her breath, blood, urine, or other bodily substance, shall be admissible and competent, provided that evidence is presented and the following conditions have been complied with:

The defendant has consented to the taking of the test upon which the analysis is made. Evidence that the defendant had refused to submit to the test shall not be admissible unless the defendant elects to testify.

A true copy of the report of the test result was mailed within seventy-two (72) hours of the taking of the test to the person submitting to a breath test.

Any person submitting to a chemical test of blood, urine or other body fluids shall have a true copy of the report of the test result mailed to him or her within thirty (30) days following the taking of the test.

The test was performed according to methods and with equipment approved by the director of the department of health of the state of Rhode Island and by an authorized individual.

Equipment used for the conduct of the tests buy means of breath analysis had been tested for accuracy within thirty (30) days preceding the test by personnel qualified as hereinbefore provided, and breathalyzer operators shall be qualified and certified by the department of health within three hundred sixty-five (365) days of the test.

The person arrested and charged with operating a watercraft while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, toluene or any controlled substance, or any combination of these in violation of subsection (a) of this section was afforded the opportunity to have an additional chemical test. The officer arresting or so charging the person shall have informed the person of this right and afforded him or her a reasonable opportunity to exercise this right, and a notation to this effect is made in the official records of the case in the applicable law enforcement department. Refusal to permit an additional chemical test shall render incompetent and inadmissible in evidence the original report.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 103, § 1.

46-22.2-7.
Testing of blood of persons killed in watercraft accidents.

The director of the department of health shall provide a procedure whereby all morticians in the state shall obtain blood samples from all watercraft operators who have died as a result of and contemporaneously with an accident involving a watercraft.

All law enforcement officers shall report such fatalities to the director of the department of health immediately after their occurrence.

The blood sample, with such other information as may be required, shall be delivered to the director of the department of health. Upon receipt of such sample the director shall cause such tests to be performed as may be required to determine the amount of alcohol or controlled substance that may be contained in such sample.

The results of such tests shall be used exclusively for statistical purposes and the sample shall never be identified with the name of the deceased. Any person releasing or making public such information, other than as herein prescribed, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 231, § 1.

46-22.2-8.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter, which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 231, § 1.